Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-1301.5] Curricular
materials; digital format. Moneys allocated for printed curricular
materials may be expended to purchase digital formats of the curricular
materials. [L 2016, c 112, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next